static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥзы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥм [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥмы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсты [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдтэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызтэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсын [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынызы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыным [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынымы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысен [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысенызы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеным [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысенымы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтызы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтым [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтымы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсэтӥ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКПТХЦЧШЩӜӞӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёс [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсад [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсады [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсаз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсазы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсам [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсамы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёслань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёслы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёслэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёслэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсме [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмес [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмылань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмылы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмылэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмылэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмыозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмытэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсмыя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозяд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозяды [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозяз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозязы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозям [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсозямы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссылэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссыозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссытэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссыя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссэ [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёссэс [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥ [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥды [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥзы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥм [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстӥмы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсты [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстылэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстыозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстытэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстыя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэ [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёстэс [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсъя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдлэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдтэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыдъя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызлэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызтэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсызъя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылань [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылэн [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсылэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсын [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынлэсь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныды [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыныз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынызы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыным [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсынымы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыозь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысен [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныды [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеныз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысенызы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысеным [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысенымы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысь [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыд [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыды [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтыз [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтызы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтым [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсысьтымы [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсытэк [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсыя [ЛМНРСФ]
SFX Q1 0 -ъёсэтӥ [ЛМНРСФ]
