static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
Ⅲ/Q1
РДК/Q1
РДП/Q1
РДЮСШ/Q1
РК/Q1
РККД/Q1
РКСМ/Q1
РОА/Q1
РОНО/Q1
РОС/Q1
РПС/Q1
РСБ/Q1
РСТ/Q1
РСФСР/Q1
РТП/Q1
РТС/Q1
РЦУМ/Q1
РЭС/Q1
САМБ/Q1
СарКОО/Q1
СБС-АГРО/Q1
СВО/Q1
СД/Q1
СЕВ/Q1
СЗФО/Q1
СИК/Q1
СКВ/Q1
СКС/Q1
СЛИ/Q1
СМЗ/Q1
СМП/Q1
СМУ/Q1
СНИЛС/Q1
СОБР/Q1
СОФИН/Q1
СПбГУ/Q1
СПИД/Q1
СПС/Q1
СРДДиМ/Q1
СС/Q1
ССР/Q1
СССР/Q1
СТЗ/Q1
СУ/Q1
СХПК/Q1
СЦБТ/Q1
США/Q1
СЭВ/Q1
ТАСС/Q1
ТДС/Q1
ТОЗ/Q1
ТОР/Q1
ТОС/Q1
ТПО/Q1
ТРК/Q1
ТСЖ/Q1
ТТУ/Q1
ТЭФИ/Q1
УАЗ/Q1
УАССР/Q1
УБХСС/Q1
УВД/Q1
УГТУ/Q1
УдГУ/Q1
УЕФА/Q1
УЗЧ/Q1
УК/Q1
УКС/Q1
УМОО/Q1
УМС/Q1
УНКВД/Q1
УПК/Q1
УР/Q1
УрО/Q1
УрЮ/Q1
УССР/Q1
УФАС/Q1
УФПС/Q1
УФСИН/Q1
УФСНП/Q1
ФАП/Q1
ФБУ/Q1
ФГӦП/Q1
ФГУП/Q1
ФЗО/Q1
ФИДЕ/Q1
ФМС/Q1
ФНС/Q1
ФОМС/Q1
ФПС/Q1
ФСБ/Q1
ФСК/Q1
ФСКН/Q1
ФСФО/Q1
ХК/Q1
ЦБС/Q1
ЦДК/Q1
ЦДНИИ/Q1
ЦЗН/Q1
ЦК/Q1
ЦНТИ/Q1
ЦПШ/Q1
ЦРУ/Q1
ЦСП/Q1
ЦТП/Q1
ЦЧО/Q1
ЧК/Q1
ЧОКЦ/Q1
ЧПУ/Q1
ШКМ/Q1
ЭВМ/Q1
ЭКСПО/Q1
ЭРОДДиМ/Q1
ЮВК/Q1
ЮЗС/Q1
ЮНЕСКО/Q1
ЮНКО/Q1
ЯЗ/Q1
ВВЦ/Q1
ВуАРП/Q1
НИОТК/Q1
НМЦП/Q1
РНМЦ/Q1
ЦГСЭН/Q1
ЯК/Q1
ГПО/Q1
ЛСД/Q1
ПХО/Q1
РМО/Q1
ЦГА/Q1
